Arkansas, session 2025, SB522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-42-304(c), concerning tuition and fees
paid by students attending the Arkansas School for Mathematics, Sciences, and
the Arts, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Students who are residents of this state selected to attend the
school school's residential programs shall not be required to pay tuition,
fees, or room and board.
(2) Students who are residents of other countries selected to
attend the school shall pay the cost of tuition, fees, and room and board as
established by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas.
(3) Students who are enrolled in the school's online programs
shall pay the cost of tuition and fees as established by the Board of
Trustees of the University of Arkansas.
*CRH291*
03-20-2025 15:43:30 CRH291

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB522

/s/M. McKee


































03-20-2025 15:43:30 CRH291